Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 17

Leave Policy for Arrested Employees

7-51-1701. Leave policy for arrested employee — Restoring back pay.

If a municipality or county has or implements a personnel policy that places an employee on leave for any period of time immediately following any arrest of the employee, the municipality or county must also implement a policy of restoring back pay to the employee if the charges are dropped or the employee is found not guilty of the charges. This requirement shall not apply if the employee pleads guilty to the charges or enters into a plea agreement on the charges.

Acts 2008, ch. 1105, § 1.